Idaho, session 2026, S1359.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 28, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 54, Title 28, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 54
VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSK FRAUD PREVENTION ACT
28-5401. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Virtual Currency Kiosk Fraud Prevention Act."
28-5402. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Blockchain analytics" means the analysis of data from blockchains
or public distributed ledgers, including associated transaction informa-
tion.
(2) "Blockchain analytics and tracing software" means a software ser-
vice that uses blockchain analytics data to provide risk-specific informa-
tion and tracing of virtual currency wallet addresses.
(3) "Department" means the Idaho department of finance.
(4) "Fraud" or "fraudulent" means an intentional deception or misrep-
resentation made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could re-
sult in some unauthorized benefit to himself or some other person.
(5) "New customer" means a user who is transacting with an operator:
(a) For the first time; or
(b) Within seventy-two (72) hours after such user's first transaction
with the operator.
(6)(a) "Operator" means a person who owns, operates, or manages a vir-
tual currency kiosk located in the United States or in any United States
territory.
(b) "Operator" does not include a bank or credit union that solely pro-
vides services to supply a virtual currency kiosk with legal tender or


that provides deposit services for legal tender deposited in a virtual
currency kiosk.
(7) "Potentially vulnerable older adult" means a person sixty-five
(65) years of age or older who is unable to protect himself from maltreatment
because of:
(a) A mental, physical, or developmental disability;
(b) A degenerative brain disease;
(c) An inability to communicate or implement decisions regarding his
person; or
(d) Other infirmities of aging in an older adult.
(8) "Transaction fees" means fees or expenses paid by a user in order
to conduct a virtual currency kiosk transaction. Transaction fees equal the
difference between the market price of the virtual currency and the price of
the virtual currency charged to the user.
(9) "Transaction hash" means the unique alphanumeric identifier as-
signed to a virtual currency kiosk transaction.
(10) "User" means any individual or entity that initiates, authorizes,
or completes a transaction involving virtual currency through a virtual cur-
rency kiosk, whether for the purpose of purchasing, selling, transferring,
or otherwise exchanging virtual currency.
(11) "Virtual currency" means a type of digital asset, as defined in
section 28-5303, Idaho Code, that confers economic, proprietary, or access
rights or powers and is recorded using cryptographically secured dis-
tributed ledger technology or any similar analogue.
(12) "Virtual currency address" means an alphanumeric identifier asso-
ciated with a virtual currency wallet identifying the location to which a
virtual currency transaction can be sent.
(13) "Virtual currency kiosk" means a stand-alone machine that is ca-
pable of accepting or dispensing legal tender in exchange for virtual cur-
rency.
(14) "Virtual currency kiosk transaction" means a transaction con-
ducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual
currency kiosk. Virtual currency kiosk transaction also means a transaction
made at a virtual currency kiosk to purchase virtual currency with or to sell
virtual currency for United States dollars.
(15) "Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or other
mechanism providing a means to hold the keys necessary to access and transfer
virtual currency.
28-5403. OPERATOR LICENSING REQUIREMENT. In order for an operator to
engage in or hold itself out as being able to engage in a virtual currency
kiosk transaction, such operator must be a licensed money transmitter pur-
suant to the provisions of chapter 29, title 26, Idaho Code.
28-5404. OPERATOR REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) An operator shall com-
plete, collect, and maintain quarterly reports and any supporting records
for each virtual currency kiosk that it operates in Idaho. Such reports and
records shall be made available to the department, upon request, in a format
specified by the department, within three (3) business days of such request.


Reports pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, the follow-
ing information:
(a) The operator's legal name;
(b) Any fictitious or trade name used by the operator, if applicable;
(c) The operator's physical address;
(d) The date the operator commenced operation of the virtual currency
kiosk at the location;
(e) The date the operator ceased operation of the virtual currency
kiosk at the location, if applicable;
(f) Each address used by the operator to provide customer service in
Idaho; and
(g) The number of transactions that the operator declined due to suspi-
cion of fraud or other illegal activity.
(2) An operator shall complete, collect, and maintain annual reports
and any supporting records for each virtual currency kiosk it operates in
Idaho, to be completed on or before March 31, relating to the operator's
business conducted in the prior year. Such reports and records shall be made
available to the department, upon request, in a format specified by the de-
partment, within three (3) business days of such request. A report pursuant
to this subsection shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall
include, at a minimum:
(a) Gross revenue attributable to virtual currency transactions con-
ducted via virtual currency kiosks in the state;
(b) A copy of any complaint filed against the operator with the bet-
ter business bureau, with any state agency other than the department, or
with any federal agency, and a description of the resolution, if any, of
each such complaint;
(c) The total number and value of virtual currency transactions con-
ducted via the operator's virtual currency kiosks in the state;
(d) The total number of refunds requested by users, the number of refund
requests granted and the number of refund requests denied by the opera-
tor, and the total dollar amount of such refunds;
(e) Contact details of the operator's compliance officer;
(f) A dedicated United States phone number and email address for commu-
nications with government fraud investigators and law enforcement; and
(g) The total number of virtual currency corresponding locations.
(3) The phone number and email address required pursuant to subsection
(2)(f) of this section shall be frequently monitored. Upon request from law
enforcement or the department, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall pro-
vide trace findings and grant assistance with blockchain analytics for in-
vestigative purposes.
(4) Within ten (10) business days after receipt of a request from the
department, the virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide any transac-
tion and user information requested by the department, including with re-
spect to any transactions attempted but denied.
(5) Transaction data collected by the department pursuant to this sec-
tion shall be confidential and may be released only in composite form, unless
otherwise required by law.


(6) Failure to complete, collect, or maintain a report or record as re-
quired pursuant to this section, or to timely provide such reports or records
to the department, shall constitute a violation of this chapter.
28-5405. MANDATORY DISCLOSURES. (1) An operator shall disclose all
relevant terms and conditions generally associated with the products, ser-
vices, and activities of the operator and virtual currency, including but
not limited to transaction fees collected and exchange rates used. Such dis-
closures shall be made in a clear, conspicuous, and easily readable manner in
the language chosen by the user.
(2) A user who engages with a virtual currency kiosk shall receive ac-
knowledgment of receipt of all disclosures required under this section via
confirmation of consent at such virtual currency kiosk.
(3) The disclosures required by this section shall address the follow-
ing in substantially the following form:
WARNING: this technology can be used to defraud you.
If someone asked you to deposit money in this machine and/or is on the
phone with you and claims to be a:
Friend or family member,
Government agent,
Computer software representative,
Bill collector,
Law enforcement officer, or
A person whom you do not know...
STOP THIS TRANSACTION IMMEDIATELY, contact law enforcement, and notify
the kiosk operator.
This may be a scam. NEVER SEND MONEY TO SOMEONE YOU DO NOT KNOW.
(4) The material risks associated with virtual currency and virtual
currency transactions shall be disclosed to each user of a virtual currency
kiosk in Idaho. Such disclosures shall be accompanied by information that
may be used by a user to seek assistance, including:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the operator;
(b) The days and times the operator is available and the methods that a
user may use to contact the operator for assistance; and
(c) The contact information for state and local law enforcement, which
shall be displayed on or at the location of the virtual currency kiosk or
on the first screen of such kiosk.
28-5406. CUSTOMER SERVICE REQUIREMENTS. (1) An operator shall provide
live customer service at a toll-free number seven (7) days a week. Daily
business hours shall be from, at a minimum, 8:00 a.m. to 8:00 p.m. local time
for all Idaho locations where the operator's virtual currency kiosks are lo-
cated.


(2) Trained representatives of an operator shall be available to re-
spond to customer telephone inquiries during the business hours required
pursuant to this section.
(3) Inquiries received after normal business hours shall be responded
to by a trained representative on the next business day.
28-5407. TRANSACTION RECEIPTS. (1) An operator shall provide each
user with paper or electronic receipts at the conclusion of each virtual
currency kiosk transaction.
(2) A receipt required pursuant to this section shall include the fol-
lowing information:
(a) The operator's name and toll-free customer service phone number
with operating hours;
(b) Relevant contact information for the operator, state and local law
enforcement, and the department;
(c) Type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction and each ap-
plicable virtual currency address and transaction hash;
(d) All transaction fees;
(e) The exchange rate of the virtual currency to U.S. dollars; and
(f) The virtual currency kiosk operator's refund policy.
28-5408. PREVENTION OF FRAUDULENT ACTIVITY AND MONEY LAUNDERING. (1)
An operator shall take reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud and money
laundering. This shall include:
(a) Establishing and maintaining a written anti-fraud policy;
(b) Using blockchain analytics and tracing software to assist in the
prevention of sending virtual currency to a virtual currency wallet
known or likely to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of
a transaction and to detect transaction patterns indicative of fraud or
other illicit activities;
(c) Blocking transactions to virtual currency wallets associated
with overseas exchanges non-accessible for users located in the United
States;
(d) Not accepting from or dispensing to a new customer an amount that
is more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in United States currency,
or its equivalent in virtual currency, during any twenty-four (24) hour
period;
(e) Ensuring that during the thirty (30) calendar days following a new
customer's first transaction, the cumulative total of all transactions
with an operator shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in U.S.
currency or its equivalent in virtual currency; and
(f) Implementing the following protections for new customers:
(i) Delaying settlement of a new customer's first virtual cur-
rency kiosk transaction for seventy-two (72) hours; and
(ii) Allowing, upon request, for the full refund of any fraudulent
virtual currency kiosk transaction experienced by a new customer
within seventy-two (72) hours after such transaction, if such
user:


1. Contacts the operator in writing to provide notice of the
fraudulent nature of the virtual currency kiosk transac-
tion; and
2. Files a report with a government or law enforcement
agency memorializing the fraudulent nature of the virtual
currency kiosk transaction.
(2) A refund pursuant to subsection (1)(f) this section shall include
all transaction fees paid by a new customer at the time of the transaction and
shall occur within ten (10) business days after such new customer provides
notice of a fraudulent virtual currency transaction. A refund pursuant to
this section shall be paid to a user in the user's originating currency.
(3) The transaction limits and protections provided for in this sec-
tion shall apply to all virtual currency transactions offered by an operator
through a virtual currency kiosk and any affiliated kiosks.
(4) The department may request evidence from any virtual currency kiosk
operator of its current use of blockchain analytics as part of the operator's
registration and maintenance of a money transmitter license.
(5) An operator shall provide notice to users regarding the delayed
settlement or refund provisions of this section, including contact informa-
tion to report a fraudulent transaction in writing.
28-5409. TRANSACTION FEE REFUNDS. (1) Subject to the requirements of
this section, an operator shall issue a refund of all transaction fees paid
by a user at the time of a transaction if such user experiences fraud with re-
spect to such transaction. Such refund shall be issued notwithstanding any
acknowledgment that a user may have made prior to finalizing such transac-
tion.
(2) A user who seeks a refund pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall:
(a) Have engaged in a transaction or transactions involving the virtual
currency kiosk that were affected by fraud, whether authorized or unau-
thorized;
(b) Contact the virtual currency kiosk operator to inform the opera-
tor of the fraudulent nature of the transaction or transactions at issue
within thirty (30) days after the last transaction to occur or becoming
aware of the theft; and
(c) Within thirty (30) days after contacting the virtual kiosk opera-
tor, submit a police report, government agency report, or a sworn state-
ment detailing the fraudulent nature of the transaction or transactions
and provide a copy to the virtual currency kiosk operator.
(3) If conditions for refund issuance pursuant to this section are met,
an operator shall issue a full refund of transaction fees within ten (10)
business days after receiving notice from a user and receiving a copy of the
police report, government agency report, or sworn statement.
(4) A refund pursuant to this section shall be paid to a user in the
user's originating currency.
(5) The refund available pursuant to this section is distinct from the
refund available to protect new customers pursuant to section 28-5408, Idaho
Code, and such refunds shall be exclusive of each other.


28-5410. PENALTIES. (1) A violation of this chapter shall be deemed an
unfair and deceptive practice in violation of the Idaho consumer protection
act, chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code.
(2) The attorney general may undertake any and all actions authorized
by the Idaho consumer protection act to investigate and enforce a violation
of this chapter.
(3) A person harmed by a violation of this chapter may initiate a civil
action and may seek remedies pursuant to section 48-608, Idaho Code.
(4) In addition to any other penalties:
(a) An operator who violates this chapter shall be subject to revoca-
tion of such operator's money transmitter licensure pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 29, title 26, Idaho Code; and
(b) An operator who willfully and knowingly violates this chapter shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be sentenced to pay
a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).
28-5411. INFORMATION-SHARING RELATED TO VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSK
FRAUD. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon rea-
sonable suspicion of fraud or financial exploitation involving a virtual
currency kiosk transaction, the department, the attorney general, any state
or local law enforcement agency, the Idaho commission on aging, or an adult
protective services provider may share relevant information relating to
such suspicion for the purposes of investigation, enforcement, or consumer
protection.
(2) If the department is conducting an investigation or becomes aware
of an ongoing investigation involving suspected fraud or financial ex-
ploitation related to a virtual currency kiosk transaction, the department
shall share relevant information with the attorney general and any state or
local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction and with the Idaho commission
on aging or an adult protective services provider when the affected individ-
ual is a potentially vulnerable older adult.
(3) Information shared pursuant to this section that is confidential or
exempt from disclosure under chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, shall retain
its confidential status and shall not be subject to public disclosure except
as otherwise authorized by law.
(4) Any agency, political subdivision, or employee thereof who acts in
good faith when sharing information pursuant to this section shall be immune
from any civil or criminal liability arising from the sharing of such infor-
mation.
28-5412. APPLICABILITY. (1) This chapter shall only be construed to
regulate transactions conducted through a virtual currency kiosk.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to online transactions or over-
the-counter transactions conducted by a virtual currency kiosk owner.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to modify or limit the
applicability of any other provision of Idaho law, including the Idaho money
transmitters act, to online or over-the-counter transactions conducted by a
virtual currency kiosk owner outside of a virtual currency kiosk.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.